District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.82

Effect of chapter on prior law.

(a)

This chapter shall in no respect be considered as a repeal of the Traffic Acts of the District of Columbia, except as specifically provided herein, but shall be construed as supplemental thereto.

(b)

The Owners’ Financial Responsibility Act of the District of Columbia, is hereby repealed except with respect to any accident or judgment arising therefrom occurring prior to the effective date of this chapter. Section 50-1301.68 shall govern as to the duration of proof of financial responsibility in all cases arising under the aforementioned Act.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 139, ch. 222, § 82
Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 862, Pub. L. 86-730, § 7
1981 Ed., § 40-485.
1973 Ed., § 40-498c.
The Owners’ Financial Responsibility Act of the District of Columbia, referred to in the first sentence of subsection (b), is the Act of May 3, 1935, 49 Stat. 166, ch. 89.